fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-wawi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - wâwi - ok : # -m inanimate noun, egg AEW NI4
     wâwi+N+I+Sg: wâwi
     wâwi+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: niwâwim
     wâwi+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg: kiwâwim
     wâwi+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg: niwâwiminân
     wâwi+N+I+Px21Pl+Sg: kiwâwiminaw
     wâwi+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg: kiwâwimiwâw
     wâwi+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg: owâwim
     wâwi+N+I+Px3Pl+Sg: owâwimiwâw
     wâwi+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: owâwimiyiw

     wâwi+N+I+Pl: wâwa
     wâwi+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: niwâwima
     wâwi+N+I+Px2Sg+Pl: kiwâwima
     wâwi+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: niwâwiminâna
     wâwi+N+I+Px21Pl+Pl: kiwâwiminawa
     wâwi+N+I+Px2Pl+Pl: kiwâwimiwâwa
     wâwi+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl: owâwima
     wâwi+N+I+Px3Pl+Pl: owâwimiwâwa
     wâwi+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: owâwimiyiwa

     wâwi+N+I+Loc: wâwihk
     wâwi+N+I+Px1Sg+Loc: niwâwimihk
     wâwi+N+I+Px2Sg+Loc: kiwâwimihk
     wâwi+N+I+Px1Pl+Loc: niwâwiminâhk
     wâwi+N+I+Px21Pl+Loc: kiwâwiminâhk
     wâwi+N+I+Px2Pl+Loc: kiwâwimiwâhk
     wâwi+N+I+Px3Sg+Loc: owâwimihk
     wâwi+N+I+Px3Pl+Loc: owâwimiwâhk
     wâwi+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: owâwimiyihk

     wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Sg:          [wâwis,         wâwisis]
     wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg:    [niwâwimis,       niwâwimisis]
     wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg:    [kiwâwimis,       kiwâwimisis]
     wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg:    [niwâwimisinân,   niwâwimisisinân]
     wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px21Pl+Sg:   [kiwâwimisinaw,   kiwâwimisisinaw]
     wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg:    [kiwâwimisiwâw,   kiwâwimisisiwâw]
     wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg:    [owâwimis,        owâwimisis]
     wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Pl+Sg:    [owâwimisiwâw,    owâwimisisiwâw]
     wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: [owâwimisiyiw,    owâwimisisiyiw]

     wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Pl:          [wâwisa,       wâwisisa]
     wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl:    [niwâwimisa,     niwâwimisisa]
     wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Sg+Pl:    [kiwâwimisa,     kiwâwimisisa]
     wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl:    [niwâwimisinâna, niwâwimisisinâna]
     wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px21Pl+Pl:   [kiwâwimisinawa, kiwâwimisisinawa]
     wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Pl+Pl:    [kiwâwimisiwâwa, kiwâwimisisiwâwa]
     wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl:    [owâwimisa,      owâwimisisa]
     wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Pl+Pl:    [owâwimisiwâwa,  owâwimisisiwâwa]
     wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: [owâwimisiyiwa,  owâwimisisiyiwa]
